Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.160

Applicants—Required documentation—Criteria—Rules. (Effective until June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) An applicant for a license to practice as a registered nurse shall submit to the *commission:

(a) An attested written application on a department form;

(b) An official transcript demonstrating graduation and successful completion of an approved program of nursing; and

(c) Any other official records specified by the *commission.

(2) An applicant for a license to practice as an advanced registered nurse practitioner shall submit to the *commission:

(a) An attested written application on a department form;

(b) An official transcript demonstrating graduation and successful completion of an advanced registered nurse practitioner program meeting criteria established by the *commission; and

(c) Any other official records specified by the *commission.

(3) An applicant for a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse shall submit to the *commission:

(a) An attested written application on a department form;

(b) Written official evidence that the applicant is over the age of eighteen;

(c) An official transcript demonstrating graduation and successful completion of an approved practical nursing program, or its equivalent; and

(d) Any other official records specified by the *commission.

(4) At the time of submission of the application, the applicant for a license to practice as a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse must not be in violation of chapter 18.130 RCW or this chapter.

(5) The *commission shall establish by rule the criteria for evaluating the education of all applicants.

[2004 c 262 s 6; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 416.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

Findings—2004 c 262: See note following RCW 18.06.050.

PDFRCW 18.79.160

Applicants—Required documentation—Criteria—Rules. (Effective June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) An applicant for a license to practice as a registered nurse shall submit to the board:

(a) An attested written application on a department form;

(b) An official transcript demonstrating graduation and successful completion of an approved program of nursing; and

(c) Any other official records specified by the board.

(2) An applicant for a license to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse shall submit to the board:

(a) An attested written application on a department form;

(b) An official transcript demonstrating graduation and successful completion of an advanced practice registered nurse program meeting criteria established by the board; and

(c) Any other official records specified by the board.

(3) An applicant for a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse shall submit to the board:

(a) An attested written application on a department form;

(b) Written official evidence that the applicant is over the age of eighteen;

(c) An official transcript demonstrating graduation and successful completion of an approved practical nursing program, or its equivalent; and

(d) Any other official records specified by the board.

(4) At the time of submission of the application, the applicant for a license to practice as a registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse must not be in violation of chapter 18.130 RCW or this chapter.

(5) The board shall establish by rule the criteria for evaluating the education of all applicants.

[2024 c 239 s 7; 2004 c 262 s 6; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 416.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 239: See note following RCW 18.79.030.

Findings—2004 c 262: See note following RCW 18.06.050.